Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.764

Loan program for mathematics and science teachers—Cooperation by office and institutions of higher education.

The office and institutions of higher education shall work cooperatively to implement RCW 28B.15.762 and to publicize this program to eligible students.

[ 2012 c 229 s 603; 1985 c 370 s 81; 1983 1st ex.s. c 74 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 74: See note following RCW 28B.15.760.